Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-605
Persons disqualified to serve as surrogate.

Unless related to the individual by blood, marriage, or adoption, a surrogate may not be an owner, operator, or employee of a health care facility at which the individual is residing or receiving health care or a facility or an institution of the Department of Correctional Services or the Department of Health and Human Services to which the individual has been committed.

Laws 2018, LB104, § 5.